Utah statutes.
78A-7-109.   Process to any part of the state -- Service.
(1)  Process from a justice court may be issued to any place in the state.
(2)  Subpoenas in any action or proceeding of a justice court may be issued to
any place in the state.
(3)  All warrants issued by a justice court for violation of any state law or
local ordinance within a court's jurisdiction are directed to the sheriff, any
constable of the county, or to the marshal or city police of the town or city.
